Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 1 Duties and Liabilities of Carriers Generally

46-9-40.
Duty of common carriers to receive goods.

A person holding himself out to the public as a common carrier is bound to receive all goods offered to him that he is able and accustomed to carry, upon compliance with such reasonable regulations as he may adopt for his own safety and the benefit of the public.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2042; Code 1868, § 2043; Code 1873, § 2069; Code 1882, § 2069; Civil Code 1895, § 2278; Civil Code 1910, § 2729; Code 1933, § 18-301.

46-9-41.
Duty of common carriers to transport and deliver goods safely and without unreasonable delay.

A common carrier shall have the duty of transporting and delivering goods safely and without unreasonable delay.

History.

Laws 1847, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 398; Code 1863, § 2045; Code 1868, § 2047; Code 1873, § 2073; Code 1882, § 2073; Civil Code 1895, § 2282; Civil Code 1910, § 2736; Code 1933, § 18-311.

46-9-42.
Effect of strike by carrier’s employees on carrier’s duty to transport goods.

A carrier who receives freight for shipment is bound to forward the freight within a reasonable time, even though his employees strike or otherwise refuse to work, provided that if the strike is accompanied with violence and intimidation so as to render it unsafe to forward the freight, the carrier shall be relieved as to liability for delay in delivering the freight, if the violence and armed resistance are of such character as could not be overcome by the carrier or controlled by the civil authorities when called upon by him.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 2283; Civil Code 1910, § 2737; Code 1933, § 18-312.

History of Code section.

The language of this section is derived in part from the decision in Haas v. Kansas City F.S. & G.R.R.,

81 Ga. 792

,

7 S.E. 629

(1888).

46-9-43.
Measure of damages for delay in delivery of goods by carrier.

If a carrier fails to deliver goods within a reasonable time, the measure of damages is the difference between the market value at the time and place they should have been delivered and the market value at the time of actual delivery.

History.

Civil Code 1895, § 2319; Civil Code 1910, § 2773; Code 1933, § 18-313.

History of Code section.

The language of this section is derived in part from the decisions in Columbus & W. Ry. v. Flournoy & Epping,

75 Ga. 745

(1885); Atlanta & W.P.R.R. v. Texas Grate Co.,

81 Ga. 602

,

9 S.E. 600

(1888); and East Tenn., V. & Ga. Ry. v. Johnson & Shahan,

85 Ga. 497

,

11 S.E. 809

(1890).

46-9-44.
Estoppel of carrier to dispute title to goods delivered to him for shipment.

A carrier may not dispute the title of the person delivering goods to him by setting up adverse title in himself or a title in third persons which is not being enforced against him.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2048; Code 1868, § 2050; Code 1873, § 2076; Code 1882, § 2076; Civil Code 1895, § 2286; Civil Code 1910, § 2740; Code 1933, § 18-305.

46-9-45.
Commencement and termination of carrier’s responsibility for goods.

The responsibility of a carrier shall commence with the delivery of the goods to him or to his agent or at the place where the carrier is accustomed or agrees to receive them. The carrier’s responsibility shall cease with the delivery of the goods at destination according to the direction of the person sending the goods or according to the custom of the trade.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2043; Code 1868, § 2044; Code 1873, § 2070; Code 1882, § 2070; Civil Code 1895, § 2279; Civil Code 1910, § 2730; Code 1933, § 18-306.

46-9-46.
Effect of delivery to consignee at intermediate point.

A common carrier may recover pro rata for the actual distance transported when the consignee voluntarily receives the goods at an intermediate point.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2049; Code 1868, § 2051; Code 1873, § 2077; Code 1882, § 2077; Civil Code 1895, § 2287; Civil Code 1910, § 2741; Code 1933, § 18-307.

46-9-47.
Fraud on carrier as to nature and value of goods.

A carrier may require the nature and value of the goods delivered to him to be made known, and any fraudulent acts, sayings, or concealment by his customers will release him from liability.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 2051; Code 1868, § 2054; Code 1873, § 2080; Code 1882, § 2080; Civil Code 1895, § 2290; Civil Code 1910, § 2744; Code 1933, § 18-309.

46-9-48.
Adjustment and payment by common carriers of claims for loss of property or overcharge for freight; effect of failure by common carrier to adjust and pay claim.

Every claim for loss of or damage to property, or for overcharge for freight, for which any common carrier of household goods may be liable shall be adjusted and paid by such common carrier within 90 days after such claim, duly verified by the claimant or his or her agent, has been filed with the agent of the initial carrier or with the agent of the carrier upon whose line the loss, damage, or overcharge actually occurred. If such claim is not adjusted and paid within the time prescribed in this Code section, the carrier shall be liable for interest thereon at the legal rate from the date of the filing of the claim until the payment thereof, and shall also be liable for a civil penalty of $50.00 for every such failure to adjust and pay said claim, to be recovered by the party damaged, provided that unless such claimant in such action recovers the full amount claimed, no penalty shall be recovered, but the recovery shall be limited to the actual loss or damage or overcharge, with interest thereon from the date of filing said claim.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 136, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 2316; Ga. L. 1906, p. 102, § 2; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2770, 2778; Code 1933, § 18-319; Ga. L. 1996, p. 950, § 6.

46-9-49.
Duty of railroad or transportation company to furnish facilities for weighing freight; measure of damages for overcharges caused by overweights or false billing.

Every railroad or transportation company in this state shall furnish suitable and adequate facilities for correctly weighing all freight offered for shipment in carload lots in this state at points where the volume of business offered is sufficient to warrant the expense.

If any officer, agent, or employee of a railroad or transportation company, or person acting for or employed by such railroad or transportation company, shall, by reason of overweights or false billing, cause such railroad or transportation company to charge for any shipment more than the actual weight of such shipment, the said railroad or transportation company shall be liable to the owner of such shipment for damages in an amount equal to twice the charges on the excess weight so charged.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 134, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2308; Civil Code 1910, § 2762; Code 1933, § 18-320.

46-9-50.
Weighing of railroad cars by certified public weighers; manner of weighing cars.

Whenever any railroad company in this state weighs any cars loaded with freight to be shipped and charged for by the carload, such weighing shall be done by a certified public weigher, as provided for the weighing of cotton, rice, and other produce.

When such cars are weighed singly, they shall be uncoupled at both ends and weighed one at a time, provided that when any railroad company transports timber, lumber, or other like articles of freight which, because of their length, overlap from one car to another, such company may cause a maximum of three such cars so loaded to be weighed together, after uncoupling them at both ends from other cars. In all such instances, the aggregate weight of the freight upon such cars shall be averaged so that each of the cars shall be charged with an equal amount of the total weight, and the shipper shall be made to pay freight as if each of the cars so weighed together did actually contain an equal portion of the whole load, provided that in such cases the shipper shall not pay less than the amount of freight due on full carloads.

Any railroad company failing, refusing, or neglecting to comply with this Code section shall be held liable in an action for damages, to be brought in the county where such weighing is done, at the instance of any person aggrieved. A sum of not less than $100.00 nor more than $200.00 shall be recoverable for each offense.

History.

Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 127, §§ 1-4; Civil Code 1895, §§ 2309, 2310, 2311, 2312; Civil Code 1910, §§ 2763, 2764, 2765, 2766; Code 1933, §§ 18-321, 18-322, 18-323.

Cross references.

Certified public weighers generally, §

10-2-40

et seq.

46-9-51.
Written application for railroad cars as prerequisite for consignors’ and shippers’ taking advantage of penalties or forfeitures for failure of company to supply cars.

Whenever a shipper or consignor requires a railroad company to furnish a car to be used in carload shipments, in order for the consignor or shipper to avail himself of the forfeitures or penalties prescribed by the rules and regulations of the commission, it must first appear that the consignor or shipper made written application to the railroad company for the car, provided that the commission shall, by reasonable rules and regulations, establish the time within which the car shall be furnished after being applied for and shall establish the penalty per day per car to be paid by the railroad company in the event the car is not furnished as ordered; provided, further, that in order for any shipper or consignor to avail himself of the penalties provided by the rules and regulations of the commission, such shipper or consignor shall likewise be subject, under proper rules to be fixed by the commission, to the orders, rules, and regulations of the commission.

History.

Ga. L. 1905, p. 120, § 2; Civil Code 1910, § 2635; Code 1933, § 93-408.

46-9-52.
Unjust discrimination in freight-transportation rates by common carriers generally.

No person, including an officer or agent of any corporation, shall, either by payment of money or other thing of value, by solicitation, or otherwise, induce any common carrier of freight within this state, or any officers or agents of the common carrier, to discriminate unjustly in favor of that person or corporation as against any other consignor or consignee in the transportation of freight to and from points in this state; and no such person shall aid or abet any common carrier in any such unjust discrimination.

Any person who violates this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition, any such person shall, together with such common carrier, be liable jointly or severally in an action to be brought by any consignor or consignee discriminated against for all damages caused by or resulting from the discrimination.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 134, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2307; Penal Code 1895, § 684; Civil Code 1910, § 2761; Penal Code 1910, § 733; Code 1933, §§ 18-318, 18-9914.

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Compelling of witnesses to testify before commission as to discrimination in rates and charges by common carriers, §

46-2-55

.

Prohibition against discrimination by railroad companies in freight-transportation rates or tariffs charged to connecting lines or routes, §

46-9-213

.

Overcharging by officers, agents, etc., of common carriers for transporting freight or passengers, §

46-9-252

.

46-9-53.
Discrimination by railroad companies in applying freight-storage charges.

In applying freight-storage charges fixed by the commission, no railroad company shall discriminate between persons, either directly or indirectly, by means of rebate or any other device.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 149, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2208; Civil Code 1910, § 2651; Code 1933, § 93-403.

Cross references.

Limitation on authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-9-54.
Making and retaining freight-storage charges in accordance with rates fixed by commission.

No railroad company shall make or retain, either directly or indirectly, any charge for storage of freight greater than that fixed by the commission for each particular storage.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 149, § 3; Civil Code 1895, § 2208; Civil Code 1910, § 2651; Code 1933, § 93-404.

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-9-55.
Remedy for persons charged excessive freight-storage rates or subjected to discrimination in application of freight-storage rates.

If any railroad company violates Code Section 46-9-53 or Code Section 46-9-54, either by exceeding the rates of storage prescribed or by discriminating as to rates charged, the person paying such overcharge or subjected to such discrimination shall have the right to bring an action for the amount of the overcharge or the amount of the difference in the rates charged, in any court of this state having jurisdiction of the claim. Such person shall have all the remedies and be entitled to recover the same penalties and damages as are prescribed in Code Sections 46-2-90 and 46-2-92.

History.

Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 149, § 4; Civil Code 1895, § 2209; Civil Code 1910, § 2652; Code 1933, § 93-405.

Cross references.

Authority of General Assembly regarding regulation of public utility rates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

Prohibition against rebates, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. III, Sec. VI, Para. V.

46-9-56.
False billing, false weighing, or false report of weight by common carriers.

Any common carrier of freight within the limits of this state or, if such common carrier is a corporation, any officer, agent, or employee thereof, who, by means of false billing, false classification, false weighing, false report of weight, or by any other device or means, knowingly and willfully assists or permits any person to obtain transportation for property from and to points within the limits of this state at less than the regular rates then established and in force on the line of transportation of such common carrier shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 134, § 1; Penal Code 1895, § 682; Penal Code 1910, § 731; Code 1933, § 18-9916.

46-9-57.
False billing or false weighing by a person who delivers property for transportation to a common carrier or for whom, as consignor or consignee, such carrier transports property.

Any person, including any officer or agent of any corporation, who delivers property to any common carrier of freights within this state for transportation within this state to any common carrier of freights within this state, or for whom, as consignor or consignee, any such carrier transports property, and who knowingly and willfully, by false billing, false classification, false weighing, false representation of the contents of the package, false report of weight, or by any other device or means, whether with or without the consent or connivance of the carrier or its agent, obtains transportation for such property at less than the regular rates then established and in force on the line of transportation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1889, p. 134, § 2; Penal Code 1895, § 683; Penal Code 1910, § 732; Code 1933, § 18-9917.